District of Columbia statutes.
7-1131.07

Appointment and duties of Chief Clinical Officer.

The Department shall have a Chief Clinical Officer, appointed by the Director, and qualified by experience and training to carry out the following functions:

(1)

Advising the Director on standards, quality assurance, risk management, and clinical practice;

(2)

Advising the Director on a full range of services and functions, including but not limited to clinical services, service needs, and program development; and

(3)

Coordinating the treatment of persons committed to the care of the Department by the court pursuant to § 21-545.

History

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 107, 48 DCR 7674

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 107 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).